Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2101 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food and Forestry
shall not require livestock to be tagged with radio frequency
identification (RFID) devices for animal disease traceability as
required by the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to
9 C.F.R., Section 86.4.
B. The Department shall contact other livestock-regulating

state agencies in beef-producing states to plan compacts between

those states and Oklahoma which would allow the sale of livestock

with out RFID tags with those states. Such proposed compacts shall
be provided to the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives
and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, who then
shall take appropriate actions to ratify the compacts.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10776 JL 01/11/25